Wisconsin, session 2025, SB416.
do enact as follows:SB416,11Section 1. 157.70 (1) (cg) of the statutes is created to read:SB416,2,22157.70 (1) (cg) “Cemetery” has the meaning given in s. 157.061 (1p).SB416,23Section 2. 157.70 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB416,2,84157.70 (3) (c) 1. Any person who knows or has reasonable grounds to believe 5that a burial site within a cemetery or the catalogued land contiguous to a 6catalogued burial site within a cemetery is disturbed or may be disturbed in 7violation of this section shall report the disturbance or potential disturbance as 8soon as reasonably possible to the local police department or county sheriff’s office.SB416,2,1192. Each sheriff and police department in the state shall prepare a report for 10each disturbance or potential disturbance reported under subd. 1. and shall send a 11copy of the report to the board and to the cemetery board.SB416,312Section 3. 440.03 (18) of the statutes is created to read:SB416,3,213440.03 (18) The department shall prescribe a form to be used by local police 14departments and county sheriff’s offices to report disturbances or potential 15disturbances to the burial sites preservation board and the cemetery board under s. 1157.70 (3) (c). The form shall include spaces to list the property address and the 2municipality in which the disturbance or potential disturbance occurred.SB416,43Section 4. 440.905 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB416,3,74440.905 (3) (a) The board shall receive reports from sheriff’s offices and police 5departments prepared under s. 157.70 (3) (c) 2. At the first board meeting each 6calendar year, the board shall review all reports received from the previous 7calendar year and shall publish each report on the board’s website.SB416,3,118(b) Annually, no later than March 1, the board shall submit a report to the 9department listing each report received under this subsection during the previous 10calendar year and the address, municipality, and county in which the disturbance 11or potential disturbance described in each report allegedly occurred.SB416,3,1212